District of Columbia statutes.
20-404

Supervised administration; powers of personal representative.

Unless restricted by the Court for good cause shown, a supervised personal representative has, without any interim order approving exercise of a power, all powers of personal representatives under this title. Any restriction on the power of a personal representative ordered by the Court must be endorsed on the letters of appointment and, unless so endorsed, is ineffective as to persons dealing in good faith with the personal representative.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(t), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-404.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-401.